Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 67.1 Rhode Island High School Dropout Prevention Act of 2007
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-67.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island High School Dropout Prevention Act of 2007.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 226, § 1.

16-67.1-2.
Targeted dropout prevention program.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall work with the school districts that have the lowest high school graduation rates. The department shall incorporate into its progressive support and intervention specific dropout prevention strategies, target resources, and gather data that will include graduation rates and educational outcomes in all Rhode Island schools.

The department shall develop specific methods of targeted intervention or identify appropriate existing methods for school districts that have a dropout rate greater than fifteen percent (15%) as determined by the department of elementary and secondary education. These interventions methods may include:

Early intervention for students who fail Algebra I or any ninth grade math class and have insufficient credits to be promoted;

Alternative programs designed to reengage dropouts including dual enrollment courses at the community college level;

Increased availability of advanced placement courses;

Offering full course fee waivers for students eligible for free and reduced lunches, when enrolled in dual credit courses;

Flexible programs for older students who are currently not enrolled;

Comprehensive supplemental education programs for middle school students who are below grade level in reading and math;

Teacher advisories and other supports that are designed to specifically address the needs of youth most at risk of dropping out of school;

Strategies that are specifically designed to improve high school graduation rate of teens at highest risk for dropping out, including youth in the foster care system, pregnant and parenting youth, English as a second language learners, and teens with special education needs; and

Communicating with parents and students about the availability of local afterschool programs and the academic enrichment and other activities the programs offer.

The department shall also gather the following data to ensure that all programs are research-based and data-driven and use such data for continuous program improvement:

The total number of high school suspensions related to truancy;

Total number of students enrolled in alternative programs;

Total number of students who have been reenrolled in programs with flexible schedules or community college programs;

Total number of freshmen who have personal literacy plans (PLPs);

Total number of students who have failed Algebra I or ninth grade math;

Total number of students who are repeating the ninth grade;

Total number of students receiving remedial programming in the ninth grade; and

The percentage of children in the care of DCYF who do not graduate from high school.

In school districts involved in progressive support intervention the department of elementary and secondary education shall prepare and submit each year a written report that documents:

The outcomes of the dropout prevention strategies to date, at the school district level; and

How the school district dropout prevention strategies and activities will be modified, based on the data.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 226, § 1.

16-67.1-3.
Defining the protocol for a student to leave school.

Children who have not yet attained eighteen (18) years of age may not withdraw from school before graduation unless they have previously developed an alternative learning plan in accordance with §

16-19-1(b)

and, after implementation of the plan:

The student, the student’s parent(s)/guardian, and an administrator agree to the withdrawal;

At the exit interview, the student and the student’s parent(s)/guardian provide written acknowledgement of the withdrawal that meets the requirements of subsection (a)(4)(iv) of this section;

The school principal provides written consent for the student to withdraw from school; and/or

The withdrawal is:

Due to documented financial hardship and the need of the individual to be employed to support the individual’s family or a dependent;

Due to documented illness;

By order of a court that has jurisdiction over the student; or

Accompanied by a written acknowledgement of a withdrawal under subsection (a)(2) of this section which must include a statement that the student and the student’s parent(s)/guardian understand that withdrawal from school is likely to reduce the student’s future earnings and increase the student’s likelihood of being unemployed in the future.

If a child of the age described in subsection (a) is habitually absent from school and the school is unable to contact the parent(s)/guardian, the school may withdraw the child from enrollment provided that its attempts to contact the parent(s)/guardian by telephone, regular and registered mail, and home visit are documented. If a child who has been withdrawn from enrollment under this subsection returns to school, or if the school mistakenly withdraws the child from enrollment, the child shall immediately be re-enrolled.

An extended withdrawal pursuant to §

16-19-1

may be authorized that is not intended to be a permanent withdrawal but which is extended because of unique difficulties and interruptions that many students are experiencing because of the COVID-19 pandemic.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 17; P.L. 2011, ch. 338, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 376, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 389, § 2, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 390, § 2, effective June 30, 2022.

16-67.1-4.
Rhode Island dropout prevention “double-up for college” program.

The commissioner of the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education and the commissioner of the Rhode Island board of governors for higher education may develop a plan for a high school “fast track to college” program that offers qualified individuals an opportunity to earn a high school diploma while earning credits for a certificate program or an associates degree.

To be eligible to earn a high school diploma under this section, an individual must be either:

Nineteen (19) years of age and not currently enrolled in a school; or

Seventeen (17) years of age to nineteen (19) years of age and have consent from the high school that the individual is currently enrolled in.

To complete the requirements for a high school diploma under this section, the individual must meet the graduation requirements of his or her local educational authority.

The department, in collaboration with the board of governors for higher education, shall report to the Rhode Island general assembly on the feasibility of establishing this program and the potential cost of a pilot program by January 1, 2008.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 226, § 1.